Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-647
Special taxes; payment by part owner.

It shall be sufficient in any case to describe the lot or piece of ground as the same is platted and recorded although the same belongs to several persons; but, in case any lot or piece of ground belongs to different persons, the owner of any part thereof may pay his portion of the tax on such lot or piece of ground, and his proper share may be determined by the city treasurer.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 78, p. 289;

R.S.1913, § 4939;

C.S.1922, § 4107;

C.S.1929, § 16-636;

R.S.1943, § 16-647.